Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 13
HIGHER EDUCATION
STATEWIDE EXPECTATIONS AND GOALS AND QUALITY INDICATOR SYSTEM

23-13-101 to 23-13-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article repealed, (SB 11-052), ch. 232, p. 999, § 5, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1985, repealed and reenacted in 1996, and repealed in 2011. For amendments to this article prior to 2011, consult the 2010 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act repealing this article, see section 1 of chapter 232, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.